Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-117
Drainage improvements; appeal; transcript; certification to county board.

The clerk of the district court, immediately after the close of the term at which the appeal is tried, as provided for in section 31-116, shall certify to the county board a full and complete transcript of the proceedings had upon such appeal in the district court, and the commissioners shall make such entry on their journals as may be necessary to give effect to the judgment of the district court.

Laws 1881, c. 51, § 17, p. 242;

Laws 1911, c. 140, § 17, p. 459;

R.S.1913, § 1734;

C.S.1922, § 1681;

C.S.1929, § 31-117;

R.S.1943, § 31-117.

The portion of the report and apportionment of engineer and board, which affects property of appellant, must appear in record. Union Pac. R. Co. v. Colfax County, 84 Neb. 778, 122 N.W. 29 (1909).